Nevada, session 83, AB447.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 361.4722 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
361.4722 1. Except as otherwise provided in or required to
carry out the provisions of subsection 3 and NRS 361.4725 to
361.4729, inclusive, the owner of any parcel or other taxable unit of
property, including property entered on the central assessment roll,
for which an assessed valuation was separately established for the
immediately preceding fiscal year is entitled to a partial abatement
of the ad valorem taxes levied in a county on that property each
fiscal year equal to the amount by which the product of the
combined rate of all ad valorem taxes levied in that county on the
property for that fiscal year and the amount of the assessed valuation
of the property which is taxable in that county for that fiscal year,
excluding any increase in the assessed valuation of the property
from the immediately preceding fiscal year as a result of any
improvement to or change in the actual or authorized use of the
property, exceeds the sum obtained by adding:
(a) The amount of all the ad valorem taxes:
(1) Levied in that county on the property for the immediately
preceding fiscal year; or
(2) Which would have been levied in that county on the
property for the immediately preceding fiscal year if not for any
exemptions from taxation that applied to the property for that prior
fiscal year but do not apply to the property for the current fiscal
year,
 whichever is greater; and
(b) A percentage of the amount determined pursuant to
paragraph (a) which is equal to:
(1) The greater of:
(I) The average percentage of change in the assessed
valuation of all the taxable property in the county, as determined by
the Department, over the fiscal year in which the levy is made and
the 9 immediately preceding fiscal years;
(II) Twice the percentage of increase in the Consumer
Price Index for all Urban Consumers, U.S. City Average (All Items)
for the immediately preceding calendar year; or
(III) Zero; or
-
*AB447*

– 3 –
(2) Eight percent,
 whichever is less.
2. Except as otherwise provided in or required to carry out the
provisions of NRS 361.4725 to 361.4729, inclusive, the owner of
any remainder parcel of real property for which no assessed
valuation was separately established for the immediately preceding
fiscal year, is entitled to a partial abatement of the ad valorem taxes
levied in a county on that property for a fiscal year equal to the
amount by which the product of the combined rate of all ad valorem
taxes levied in that county on the property for that fiscal year and
the amount of the assessed valuation of the property which is
taxable in that county for that fiscal year, excluding any amount of
that assessed valuation attributable to any improvement to or change
in the actual or authorized use of the property that would not have
been included in the calculation of the assessed valuation of the
property for the immediately preceding fiscal year if an assessed
valuation had been separately established for that property for that
prior fiscal year, exceeds the sum obtained by adding:
(a) The amount of all the ad valorem taxes:
(1) Which would have been levied in that county on the
property for the immediately preceding fiscal year if an assessed
valuation had been separately established for that property for that
prior fiscal year based upon all the assumptions, costs, values,
calculations and other factors and considerations that would have
been used for the valuation of that property for that prior fiscal year;
or
(2) Which would have been levied in that county on the
property for the immediately preceding fiscal year if an assessed
valuation had been separately established for that property for that
prior fiscal year based upon all the assumptions, costs, values,
calculations and other factors and considerations that would have
been used for the valuation of that property for that prior fiscal year,
and if not for any exemptions from taxation that applied to the
property for that prior fiscal year but do not apply to the property for
the current fiscal year,
 whichever is greater; and
(b) A percentage of the amount determined pursuant to
paragraph (a) which is equal to:
(1) The greater of:
(I) The average percentage of change in the assessed
valuation of all the taxable property in the county, as determined by
the Department, over the fiscal year in which the levy is made and
the 9 immediately preceding fiscal years;
-
*AB447*

– 4 –
(II) Twice the percentage of increase in the Consumer
Price Index for all Urban Consumers, U.S. City Average (All Items)
for the immediately preceding calendar year; or
(III) Zero; or
(2) Eight percent,
 whichever is less.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to any property
for which the provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 361.4723 or
subsection 1 or 2 of NRS 361.4724 provide a greater abatement
from taxation.
4. Except as otherwise required to carry out the provisions of
NRS 361.4732 and any regulations adopted pursuant to NRS
361.4733, the amount of any reduction in the ad valorem taxes
levied in a county for a fiscal year as a result of the application of
the provisions of subsections 1 and 2 must be deducted from the
amount of ad valorem taxes each taxing entity would otherwise be
entitled to receive for that fiscal year in the same proportion as the
rate of ad valorem taxes levied in the county on the property by or
on behalf of that taxing entity for that fiscal year bears to the
combined rate of all ad valorem taxes levied in the county on the
property by or on behalf of all taxing entities for that fiscal year.
5. The Nevada Tax Commission shall adopt such regulations as
it deems appropriate to ensure that this section is carried out in a
uniform and equal manner.
6. For the purposes of this section, “remainder parcel of real
property” means a parcel of real property which remains after the
creation of new parcels of real property for development from one
or more existing parcels of real property, if the use of that remaining
parcel has not changed from the immediately preceding fiscal year.
Sec. 2. NRS 361.4724 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.4724 1. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that
many Nevadans who cannot afford to own their own homes would
be adversely affected by large unanticipated increases in property
taxes, as those tax increases are passed down to renters in the form
of rent increases , and therefore the benefits of a charitable
exemption pursuant to subsection 8 of Section 1 of Article 10 of the
Nevada Constitution should be afforded to those Nevadans through
an abatement granted to the owners of residential rental dwellings
who charge rent that does not exceed affordable housing standards
for low-income housing. The Legislature therefore directs a partial
abatement of taxes for such owners as follows:
[1.] (a) Except as otherwise provided in or required to carry out
the provisions of [subsection 2] paragraph (b) and NRS 361.4725
to 361.4729, inclusive, if the amount of rent collected from each of
the tenants of a residential dwelling does not exceed the fair market
-
*AB447*

– 5 –
rent for the county in which the dwelling is located, as most recently
published by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development, the owner of the dwelling is entitled to a partial
abatement of the ad valorem taxes levied in a county on that
property for each fiscal year equal to the amount by which the
product of the combined rate of all ad valorem taxes levied in that
county on the property for that fiscal year and the amount of the
assessed valuation of the property which is taxable in that county for
that fiscal year, excluding any increase in the assessed valuation of
the property from the immediately preceding fiscal year as a result
of any improvement to or change in the actual or authorized use of
the property, exceeds the sum obtained by adding:
[(a)] (1) The amount of all the ad valorem taxes:
[(1)] (I) Levied in that county on the property for the
immediately preceding fiscal year; or
[(2)] (II) Which would have been levied in that county on the
property for the immediately preceding fiscal year if not for any
exemptions from taxation that applied to the property for that prior
fiscal year but do not apply to the property for the current fiscal
year,
 whichever is greater; and
[(b)] (2) Three percent of the amount determined pursuant to
[paragraph (a).] subparagraph (1).
[2.] (b) The provisions of [subsection 1] paragraph (a) do not
apply to:
[(a)] (1) Any hotels, motels or other forms of transient lodging;
[(b)] (2) Any property for which no assessed valuation was
separately established for the immediately preceding fiscal year; and
[(c)] (3) Any property for which the provisions of subsection 1
of NRS 361.4722 provide a greater abatement from taxation.
2. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that many
Nevadans who own companion animals and who cannot afford
their own homes are severely limited in their options for housing
by increases in additional rent and other fees charged to a tenant
for owning and possessing companion animals, and therefore the
benefits of a charitable exemption pursuant to subsection 8 of
Section 1 of Article 10 of the Nevada Constitution should be
afforded to those Nevadans through an abatement granted to the
owners of residential rental dwellings who do not impose
additional rent or fees or certain restrictions relating to
companion animals. The Legislature therefore directs a partial
abatement of taxes for such owners as follows:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in or required to carry out the
provisions of paragraph (b), subsection 4 and NRS 361.4725 to
361.4729, inclusive, if the owner of a residential rental dwelling
-
*AB447*

– 6 –
does not impose upon the tenants of the residential rental dwelling
a nonrefundable fee or additional rent related to companion
animals residing in the residential rental dwelling, a limitation on
the total number of companion animals allowed to reside in the
residential rental dwelling, unless such a limitation is imposed by
the locality in which the residential rental dwelling is located, or
any restriction on the breed or size of a companion animal allowed
to reside in the residential rental dwelling, except for a prohibition
against a particular companion animal that has been declared to
be dangerous or vicious in accordance with NRS 202.500, the
owner is entitled to a partial abatement of the ad valorem taxes
levied in a county on that property for each fiscal year in an
amount equal to the lesser of:
(1) Seven thousand five hundred dollars; or
(2) The sum obtained by multiplying $750 for each unit
within the residential rental dwelling that satisfies the
requirements of this subsection by a fraction, the numerator of
which is the number of months during the immediately preceding
calendar year in which a companion animal was residing in the
unit on the first day of the month, and the denominator of which is
12.
(b) The provisions of paragraph (a) do not apply to any:
(1) Hotels, motels or other forms of transient lodging; or
(2) Property for which the provisions of subsection 1 of
NRS 361.4722 provide a greater abatement from taxation.
3. Nothing in the provisions of subsection 2 shall be
construed to prohibit:
(a) A tenant from being held liable for damage caused to any
premises or facility by a companion animal which resides in a
residential rental dwelling described in subsection 2; and
(b) An owner of a residential rental dwelling or his or her
employee or agent from requiring a tenant who owns and
maintains a companion animal to remove the companion animal
from the residential rental dwelling if the companion animal:
(1) Is out of control and the renter does not take effective
action to control the animal;
(2) Is not able to control its excretion of urine or feces; or
(3) Poses a direct threat to the health and safety of others
and making a reasonable accommodation or providing alternative
policies, practices or procedures is insufficient to eliminate or
reduce the threat to an acceptable level.
4. The total abatements provided by this section must not
exceed $10 million per year.
5. Except as otherwise required to carry out the provisions
of NRS 361.4732 and any regulations adopted pursuant to
-
*AB447*

– 7 –
NRS 361.4733, the amount of any reduction in the ad valorem taxes
levied in a county for a fiscal year as a result of the application of
the provisions of subsection 1 or 2 must be deducted from the
amount of ad valorem taxes each taxing entity would otherwise be
entitled to receive for that fiscal year in the same proportion as the
rate of ad valorem taxes levied in the county on the property by or
on behalf of that taxing entity for that fiscal year bears to the
combined rate of all ad valorem taxes levied in the county on the
property by or on behalf of all taxing entities for that fiscal year.
[4.] 6. The Nevada Tax Commission shall adopt such
regulations as it deems appropriate to carry out this section.
7. As used in this section, “companion animal” means a
domesticated animal owned or possessed by a person for the
purpose of pleasure or companionship, including, without
limitation, a cat or dog.
Sec. 3. NRS 361.47285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.47285 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS
361.4722, 361.4723 and 361.4724, if a single-family residence that
is the primary residence of the owner is partially or completely
destroyed by a flood, fire, earthquake or other event for which a
state of emergency or declaration of disaster was proclaimed by the
Governor pursuant to NRS 414.070 and if, pursuant to NRS
361.084, the owner of the single-family residence is granted an
exemption of a portion of the assessed value of the single-family
residence, then for the purpose of calculating the amount of any
partial abatement to which the owner of the single-family residence
is entitled pursuant to NRS 361.4722, 361.4723 or 361.4724 for the
initial fiscal year for which the exemption applies, the amount
determined for the immediately preceding fiscal year pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 361.4722, paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 of NRS 361.4722, paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 361.4723 or subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1
of NRS 361.4724, as applicable, must be the amount determined for
the fiscal year in which the single-family residence was partially or
completely destroyed.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 361.4722, 361.4723
and 361.4724, if, pursuant to NRS 361.084, the owner of a single-
family residence is granted an exemption of a portion of the
assessed value of the single-family residence and, after the granting
of the exemption, the single-family residence is sold or transferred
in a transaction to which the provisions of chapter 375 of NRS
apply, then for the purpose of calculating the amount of any partial
abatement to which the owner of the single-family residence is
entitled pursuant to NRS 361.4722, 361.4723 or 361.4724 for the
first fiscal year immediately following the sale or transfer of the
-
*AB447*

– 8 –
single-family residence, the owner is entitled only to a partial
abatement from taxation provided pursuant to NRS 361.4722,
361.4723 or 361.4724 in an amount equal to the amount of such a
partial abatement to which the owner would have been entitled if the
exemption were not granted and the provisions of subsection 1 were
not applied.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Primary residence of the owner” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 361.4723.
(b) “Single-family residence” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 361.4723.
Sec. 4. NRS 361.4729 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.4729 If the taxable value of an improvement to real
property is reduced as a result of:
1. The partial or complete destruction or removal of the
improvement; or
2. The correction pursuant to NRS 361.768 of an
overassessment of the improvement because of a factual error,
 then for the purpose of calculating the amount of any partial
abatement to which the owner of the real property is entitled
pursuant to NRS 361.4722, 361.4723 or 361.4724 for the initial
fiscal year for which that reduction in taxable value applies, the
amount determined for the immediately preceding fiscal year
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 361.4722,
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 361.4722, paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of NRS 361.4723 or subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a)
of subsection 1 of NRS 361.4724, as applicable, must be reduced by
the same percentage as the taxable value of the real property is
reduced for that initial fiscal year as a result of the partial or
complete destruction or removal of the improvement to the property
or the correction of the overassessment of the improvement to the
property.
Sec. 5. NRS 361.4732 is hereby amended to read as follows:
361.4732 Except as otherwise required to carry out the
provisions of NRS 361.4729 and any regulations adopted pursuant
to NRS 361.4733, and notwithstanding any other provision of NRS
361.471 to 361.4735, inclusive, to the contrary, after a parcel or
other taxable unit of real property is annexed to a taxing entity:
1. The amount otherwise required to be determined pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 361.4722, paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 of NRS 361.4722, paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 361.4723 or subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1
of NRS 361.4724 with respect to that property for the first fiscal
year in which that taxing entity is entitled to levy or require the levy
on its behalf of any ad valorem taxes on the property as a result of
-
*AB447*

– 9 –
that annexation of the property, shall be deemed to be the amount of
ad valorem taxes which would have been levied on the property for
the immediately preceding fiscal year if the annexation had occurred
1 year earlier, based upon the tax rates that would have applied to
the property for the immediately preceding fiscal year if the
annexation had occurred 1 year earlier and without regard to any
exemptions from taxation that applied to the property for the
immediately preceding fiscal year but do not apply to the property
for the current fiscal year; and
2. For the purposes of any other calculations required pursuant
to the provisions of NRS 361.471 to 361.4735, inclusive, the
combined overlapping tax rate applicable to that property for the
fiscal year immediately preceding the first fiscal year in which that
taxing entity is entitled to levy or require the levy on its behalf of
any ad valorem taxes on the property as a result of that annexation
of the property, shall be deemed to be the combined overlapping tax
rate that would have applied to the property for that year if the
annexation had occurred 1 year earlier.
H
-
*AB447*